Utah statutes.
62A-7-103.   Division director -- Qualifications -- Responsibility.

(1)  The director of the division shall be appointed by the executive director with the concurrence of the board.

(2)  The director shall have a bachelor's degree from an accredited university or college, be experienced in administration, and be knowledgeable in youth corrections.

(3)  The director is the administrative head of the division.

